Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Gambling

Cross references. —

As to definition of nuisance to include a place of gambling or containing gambling devices, see §

6-6-201

.

As to using a place for the purpose of gambling as constituting a public nuisance, see §

6-6-209

.

For provision declaring gambling contracts void, see §

1-23-106

.

As to gambling being prohibited at state fair, see §

11-10-107

.

As to pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing generally, see §§

11-25-101

through

11-25-113

.

As to prohibition against gambling in places where alcoholic and malt beverages are sold, see §

12-5-204

.

As to general powers of cities and towns to suppress, restrain or prohibit gambling games or devices and destroy all instruments or devices used for the purpose of gambling, see §

15-1-103

.

As to prohibition against gambling in Hot Springs state park, see §

36-8-314

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-7-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Calcutta wagering” means wagering on the outcome of amateur contests, cutter horse racing, dog sled racing, professional rodeo events or professional golf tournament in which those who wager bid at auction for the exclusive right to “purchase” or wager upon a particular contestant or entrant in the event and when the outcome of the event has been decided the total wagers comprising the pool, less a percentage “take-out” by the event’s sponsor, is distributed to those who “purchased” or wagered upon the winning contestants or entrants;

“Gain” means the direct realization of winnings;

“Gambling” means risking any property for gain contingent in whole or in part upon lot, chance, the operation of a gambling device or the happening or outcome of an event, including a sporting event, over which the person taking a risk has no control, but does not include any of the following:

Bona fide contests of skill, speed, strength or endurance in which awards are made only to entrants or the owners of entries. This exception shall not include skill based amusement games;

Bona fide business transactions which are valid under the law of contracts;

Other acts or transactions now or hereafter expressly authorized by law;

Bingo games conducted, or pull tabs sold, by charitable or nonprofit organizations where the tickets for the bingo are sold only in this state and the pull tabs are sold only on the premises owned or occupied by the charitable or nonprofit organization provided that:

Bingo games and pull tab games shall only be conducted by charitable or nonprofit organizations, which have been in existence in this state for at least three (3) years and, commencing July 1, 2020, are licensed by the Wyoming gaming commission under W.S. 11-25-104(n) to conduct bingo or pull tab games;

In conducting bingo games and pull tab games the organization shall use only volunteers who are bona fide members of the charitable or nonprofit organization or employees or contractors who are paid by the organization to assist in the operation of the game;

Players of bingo games or pull tab games shall be eighteen (18) years or older;

At least sixty-five percent (65%) of all gross sales shall be redeemed as winnings each month. The net proceeds after payment of winnings shall be restricted as follows:

No more than forty percent (40%) of net proceeds shall be paid to distributors or manufacturers of supplies or equipment necessary to conduct the game; and

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the net proceeds remaining after payment for all costs and supplies shall be donated within one (1) year by the organization to a bona fide charitable or benevolent purpose.

The charitable or nonprofit organization conducting the bingo game or pull tab game may purchase supplies or equipment necessary to conduct the game from a distributor or manufacturer at a price based on a per card or pull tab basis subject to the limitations provided in subdivision (D)(IV)(1) of this paragraph.

Any game, wager or transaction which is incidental to a bona fide social relationship, is participated in by natural persons only, and in which no person is participating, directly or indirectly, in professional gambling;

Calcutta wagering on contests or events conducted by a bona fide nationally chartered veterans’, religious, charitable, educational or fraternal organization or nonprofit local civic or service club organized or incorporated under the laws of this state and, commencing July 1, 2020, licensed by the Wyoming gaming commission under W.S. 11-25-104(n) to conduct calcutta wagering on contests or events, provided that:

The contest or event is conducted solely in this state;

Any rules affecting the contest or requirements for participants are clearly posted;

The total prizes or prize money paid out in any one (1) contest or event does not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the total wagers;

A minimum of ten percent (10%) of the total wagers on each contest or event is donated within one (1) year by the sponsoring organization to a bona fide charitable or benevolent purpose;

No separate organization or professional person is employed to conduct the contest or event or assist therein;

The sponsoring organization before conducting the contest or event gives thirty (30) days written notice of the time and place thereof to the governing body of the county or municipality in which it intends to conduct the contest or event and the governing body does not pass a resolution objecting thereto;

The sponsoring organization has complied with the relevant sections of the internal revenue code of 1954, as amended, relating to taxes on wagering.

Display or private use of antique gambling devices in the owner’s residence;

Raffles conducted for charitable purposes;

Any lottery game authorized and run by the Wyoming lottery corporation pursuant to W.S.

9-17-101

through

9-17-128

;

The hunting license raffle provided by W.S. 23-1-302(p);

Activities authorized by the Wyoming gaming commission under title 11, chapter 25 of the Wyoming statutes.

Online sports wagering regulated under W.S.

9-24-101

through

9-24-106

;

Fantasy sports contests as defined in W.S.

9-24-101

(a)(iv).

“Gambling device” means any device, machine, paraphernalia or equipment except an antique gambling device that is used or usable in the playing phases of any professional gambling activity, whether that activity consists of gambling between persons or gambling by a person involving the playing of a machine;

“Gambling premise” means any building, room, enclosure, vehicle, vessel or other place, whether open or enclosed, used or intended to be used for professional gambling. Any place where a gambling device is found is presumed to be intended to be used for professional gambling;

“Gambling proceed” means all money or property at stake or displayed in or in connection with professional gambling;

“Gambling record” means any record, receipt, ticket, certificate, token, slip or notation given, made, used or intended to be used in connection with professional gambling;

“Professional gambling” means:

Aiding or inducing another to engage in gambling, with the intent to derive a profit therefrom; or

Participating in gambling and having, other than by virtue of skill or luck, a lesser chance of losing or a greater chance of winning than one (1) or more of the other participants.

“Profit” means benefit other than a gain, which is realized or unrealized and direct, including benefits from unequal advantage in a series of transactions but does not include benefits of proprietorship or management of a business wherein a game, wager or transaction described in W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii)(E) occurs;

“Antique gambling device” means a mechanically or electronically operated slot machine that is at least twenty-five (25) years old and used only for display or personal amusement in the owner’s residence, in public and private museums, in possession of a dealer or distributor of lawful gaming equipment or displayed at state or local historic sites;

“Charitable or nonprofit organization” means an organization recognized as a charitable or nonprofit organization under Wyoming statutes and which possesses a valid exemption from federal income tax issued by the Internal Revenue Service under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) and political parties organized under the law of Wyoming and exempt from federal income tax issued by the Internal Revenue Service under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 527;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 52, § 1.

“Skill based amusement game” means as defined by W.S. 11-25-102(a)(xix).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 105, § 1; 1985, ch. 14, § 1; 1987, ch. 105, § 1; 1991, ch. 215, § 1; 1996, ch. 115, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 52, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2013 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 200, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2021 ch. 100, § 2, effective September 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

made a stylistic change in (a)(viii)(B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a), inserting (iii)(D)(I) through (V); adding (H)(xi) through (xii); and making related and stylistic changes.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 52 § 1, effective July 1, 2007, repealed (a)(xii), as added by 2007 ch. 51, § 1, which pertained to the definition of “‘Bingo game.’”

While neither act gave effect to the other, both have been set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a)(iii), added “any of the following”; and deleted “or” at the end of (a)(iii)(E).

Laws 2011, ch. 176, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2013 amendments. —

The
2013 amendment, by ch. 55, §
1, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(iii)(J) (renumbered as (a)(iii)(K)).

The
2013 amendment, by ch. 200, §
2, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(iii)(J).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2020 amendment,

in (a)(iii)(A) added the last sentence; in (a)(iii)(D)(I) added “and, commencing July 1, 2020, are licensed by the Wyoming gaming commission under W.S. 11-25-104(n) to conduct bingo or pull tab games” at the end; in the introductory language of (a)(iii)(F) substituted “this state and, commencing July 1, 2020, licensed by the Wyoming gaming commission under W.S. 11-25-104(n) to conduct calcutta wagering on contests or events, provided that” for “this state provided that”; added (a)(iii)(M); and added (a)(xiii).

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 100, § 2, effective September 1, 2021, added (a)(iii)(N) and (a)(iii)(O).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 109, § 2, substituted "under title 11, chapter 25 of the Wyoming statutes" for "pursuant to law" in (a)(iii)(M); added "and political parties organized under the law of Wyoming and exempt from federal income tax issued by the Internal Revenue Service under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 527" in (a)(xi); and substituted "means as defined by W.S. 11-25-102(a)(xix)" for "means a game played in exchange for consideration of cash, credit or other thing of value on a fixed, commercial electrical gaming device in which the bona fide skill of the player, determined by an individual's level of strategy and skill, is a factor in determining the outcome and for which the player may be awarded a prize or other thing of value for a successful outcome" in (a)(xiii).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2007, Ch. 52, § 2 states: “It is the intent of the legislature by passage of this act that bingo, as authorized by Wyoming law, including 2007 Senate Enrolled Act 5, shall be limited to those bingo games held to be authorized by the Wyoming Supreme Court in Fraternal Order of Eagles Sheridan Aerie No.
186, Inc. v. State of Wyoming, 2006 WY 4 (Wyo. 2006) and that those games found to be prohibited in that case shall remain unlawful.”

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (a)(iii)(F)(VII), appears in 26 U.S.C.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Construction nonprecedential. —

Order granting rehearing was vacated as improvidently granted; the panel opinion was premised on State admission that casino gambling was allowed if conducted in a bona fide social relationship, and when the State reversed its position, the en banc court decided that the panel opinion interpreting this section was law of the case, but otherwise nonprecedential. N. Arapaho Tribe v. Wyoming, 429 F.3d 934, 2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 24668 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2005).

Constitutional to prosecute book-making operation. —

The statutory definition of “professional gambling” was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to the defendant, who was involved in a book-making operation. Hobbs v. State, 757 P.2d 1008,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1988).

Following items were “gambling devices,”

and they could not be saved by the claimed exception for “games of chance known as raffles or bingo conducted by charitable or nonprofit organizations” contained in former § 6-9-111: “shawnee” games, electronic bingo game, blackjack tables, crap tables, “pickle cards” and vending machine, poker chips, and cards. 37 Gambling Devices (Cheyenne Elks Club & Cheyenne Music & Vending, Inc.) v. State, 694 P.2d 711,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 436

(Wyo. 1985).

Instant racing. —

Instant racing, a patented computerized system offering pari-mutuel wagering on horse races run in the past, is not lawful in Wyoming. Instant racing terminals are illegal gambling devices prohibited by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-7-101(a)(iv). Wyoming Downs Rodeo Events v. Company V., 2006 WY 55, 134 P.3d 1223,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Pinball Machines Which Award Free Games as Gambling Devices,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 163.

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coin-operated or slot machine which may be played for amusement only or which confines winner's award to privilege of additional play or other form of amusement, as within antigambling statutes, 89 ALR2d 815.

Bridge as within gambling laws, 97 ALR2d 1420.

Paraphernalia or appliances used for recording gambling transactions or receiving or furnishing gambling information as gaming “devices” within criminal statute or ordinance, 1 ALR3d 726.

Gambling in private residence as prohibited or permitted by antigambling laws, 27 ALR3d 1074.

Construction and application of enactments relating to policy or numbers games, 70 ALR3d 897.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance regulating commercial video game enterprises, 38 ALR4th 930.

Validity, construction and application of statute or ordinance prohibiting or regulating use or occupancy of premises for bookmaking or pool selling, 82 ALR4th 356.

§ 6-7-102.
Gambling; professional gambling; penalties.

A person who engages in gambling commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

A person who engages in professional gambling commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 1, provides: “(a) Notwithstanding W.S.

6-7-102

, skill based amusement games operating in the state prior to the effective date of this section shall be allowed to continue operation until June 30, 2021 in accordance with the requirements of this section.

“(b) Any skill based amusement game that does not meet the requirements of this section shall be removed from the state by the operator.

“(c) Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this section a skill based amusement game that meets the requirements of this section shall be approved by the commission to continue operating in the state or it shall be removed from the state by the operator.

“(d) Each operator shall provide for a nationally recognized, independent gaming laboratory approved by the commission to directly submit to the commission a general functional evaluation laboratory report regarding the software installed on each skill based amusement game indicating whether the skill based amusement game is in compliance with this section. Any skill based amusement game that does not meet the requirements of this section as indicated by the laboratory report shall immediately be removed from the state by the operator.

“(e) Skill based amusement games that meet the requirements of this section shall bear a commission issued decal that identifies the operator of the game. No skill based amusement game shall be operational unless it bears a commission issued decal. The commission shall charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a decal. Each decal shall include the bucking horse and rider emblem. Fees collected shall be deposited to the commission gaming account, which is hereby created. For the period from the effective date of this section through June 30, 2021, funds within the account are continuously appropriated to the commission to pay for reasonable expenses incurred to administer this section.

“(f) No skill based amusement game shall allow a game play of more than three dollars ($3.00) per play.

“(g) No skill based amusement game shall allow a payout of more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per play.

“(h) No establishment shall have more than four (4) skill based amusement games at any one (1) time. Only an establishment that had a skill based amusement game operating within the establishment as of the effective date of this section may continue to have a skill based amusement game operating pursuant to this section.

“(j) An establishment shall not locate a skill based amusement game in an area of the establishment into which a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years may enter. An establishment shall conspicuously mark each area of the establishment with a skill based amusement game as an ‘age restricted area.’ The establishment shall not allow a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to play a skill based amusement game.

“(k) An establishment shall pay the commission a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) to continue to have skill based amusement games in the establishment until June 30, 2021. Operators of skill based amusement games shall pay the commission a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) to operate skill based amusement games until June 30, 2021. Fees paid pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the commission gaming account.

“(m) Taxes shall be calculated and paid on a weekly basis based on the net proceeds earned during the prior week on skill based amusement games. On a weekly basis, an operator shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the net proceeds earned during the prior week on the operator's skill based amusement games. The commission shall deposit these monies to the commission gaming account. The commission shall report on amounts received under this subsection to the joint appropriations committee quarterly. Once the commission gaming account reaches one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), on a weekly basis, an operator shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the net proceeds earned during the prior week on the operator's skill based amusement games and of the twenty percent (20%), the commission shall remit these monies to the state treasurer for distribution as follows:

“(i) Forty-five percent (45%) to the county and the city or town in which the skill based amusement game is located, in equal shares, or to the county alone if the skill based amusement game is not located within the boundaries of a city or town;

“(ii) Forty-five percent (45%) to the school foundation program account;

“(iii) Ten percent (10%) to the commission gaming account.

“(n) The commission may promulgate any necessary rules to implement and administer this section.

“(o) This section shall not apply to pari-mutuel wagering on events that have previously occurred.

“(p) As used in this section:

“(i) ‘Commission’ means the commission created under W.S.

11-25-101

;

“(ii) ‘Establishment’ means a single physical place of business;

“(iii) ‘Net proceeds’ means all revenue less payments to the player;

“(iv) ‘Operator’ means a person that possesses and operates skill based amusement games for profit;

“(v) ‘Skill based amusement game’ means a game played in exchange for consideration of cash, credit or other thing of value on a fixed, commercial electrical gaming device in which the bona fide skill of the player, determined by an individual's level of strategy and skill, rather than any inherent element of chance, is the primary factor in determining the outcome and for which the player may be awarded a prize or other thing of value for a successful outcome.

“(q) Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

“(r) This section is repealed effective July 1, 2021.”

For decisions upholding constitutionality of former gambling statutes. —

See State ex rel. Hynds v. Cahill, 12 Wyo. 225, 75 P. 433,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1904); State ex rel. Smith v. Gillespie, 12 Wyo. 284, 75 P. 1135,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1904); State v. Tobin, 31 Wyo. 355, 226 P. 681,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1924).

Act providing for licensing of gambling may be repealed without impairing obligation of contract or taking property without due process

of law. Littleton v. Burgess, 14 Wyo. 173, 82 P. 864,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1905).

Conducting gambling game distinguished from permitting it. —

Under former law, acquittal of conducting gambling game known as “21” did not preclude conviction for permitting it. Tobin v. State, 36 Wyo. 368, 255 P. 788,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1927).

Cashing certificates of deposit for one engaged in gambling. —

Where certificates of deposit were cashed by keeper of a gambling room for the owner of the certificates who was engaged in gambling, and who at the time was not indebted for past losses, and most of it was thereafter lost in gambling, cashing such certificates was not brought within former statute. Kinney v. Hynds, 7 Wyo. 22, 49 P. 403,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1897), reh'g denied, 7 Wyo. 22, 52 P. 1081,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1898).

Information held sufficient. —

See State v. Tobin, 31 Wyo. 355, 226 P. 681,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1924).

It was not error to admit testimony

that when defendant charged with permitting gambling game known as “21” was arrested, poker and other games were being conducted. Tobin v. State, 36 Wyo. 368, 255 P. 788,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1927).

Instruction held error. —

An instruction that, if defendant “distributed said chips and said things of value to the participants in said game, and collected money for the same from the loser, … he conducted and carried on a gambling game,” was erroneous as submitting the case, not on offense charged in the information as identified by prosecuting witness who was first witness called by prosecution, but on facts testified to by other witnesses concerning other games. State v. Wells, 29 Wyo. 335, 212 P. 1099,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1923).

Applied

in

State v. Branney, 62 Wyo. 40, 160 P.2d 972,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1945).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Entrapment to commit offense with respect to gambling or lotteries, 31 ALR2d 1212.

Admissibility of evidence of other acts of gambling, 64 ALR2d 823.

Criminal liability of member or agent of private club or association, or of owner or lessor of its premises, for violation of state or local liquor or gambling laws thereon, 98 ALR3d 694.

Construction and application of statute or ordinance prohibiting or regulating bookmaking or pool selling, 84 ALR4th 740.

§ 6-7-103.
Gambling devices, gambling records, gambling proceeds subject to seizure; disposition thereof; antique gambling devices protected.

All gambling devices, gambling records and gambling proceeds are subject to seizure by any peace officer and shall be disposed of in accordance with law. An antique gambling device as defined by W.S. 6-7-101(a)(x) shall not be subject to seizure unless it is used in any way in violation of this article.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1991, ch. 215, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to gambling places and devices being declared nuisances, see §§

6-6-201

,

6-6-209

.

As to disposition of seized property, see §

7-2-105

.

As to general power of cities and towns to destroy gambling devices, see §

15-1-103

.

Actual use of gambling device not required. —

This section does not give the slightest suggestion that gambling device or paraphernalia such as is described in the section must be in actual use for purpose of gambling before it may be seized and disposed of. State v. Branney, 62 Wyo. 40, 160 P.2d 972,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1945).

Burden of proof. —

Intervening claimant who sought to prevent destruction of alleged gambling paraphernalia had burden of showing that questioned machines were not of the character denounced by section. State v. Branney, 62 Wyo. 40, 160 P.2d 972,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1945).

Applied

in

Hobbs v. State, 757 P.2d 1008,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Forfeiture of property used in connection with gaming before trial of individual offender, 3 ALR2d 738.

Forfeiture of money used in connection with gambling or seized by officers in connection with an arrest or search on premises where such activity took place, 19 ALR2d 1228.

Lawfulness of seizure of property used in violation of law as prerequisite to forfeiture action or proceeding, 8 ALR3d 473.

Constitutionality of statute providing for destruction of gambling devices, 14 ALR3d 366.

Validity of state or local gross receipts tax on gambling, 21 ALR5th 812.

§ 6-7-104.
Advertising of allowable gambling activities or events.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits the advertising of any gambling activity or event excluded from gambling under W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii) and conducted by or for any charitable or nonprofit organization or conducted as a promotional activity by a private business entity which is clearly occasional and ancillary to the primary business of that entity.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 211, § 1.